Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1812
Rate proceeding; intervention by county or city.

On timely filing of a petition for intervention, any county or city may intervene, on behalf of ratepayers located within their respective boundaries, in any rate proceeding before the commission that involves the rates of a jurisdictional utility serving ratepayers located within their respective boundaries.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 12.